Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1914 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any contractor performing work on behalf of the Department
of Transportation within this state shall install business access
signage during the duration of the project when normal access to
adjacent businesses is affected by construction activities.
Business access signage shall:
Req. No. 15450 Page 1

1. Be placed in a manner that provides clear directional
guidance to affected business entrances and driveways; and
2. Comply with standards set forth in the most recent edition
of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices as adopted by the
Department of Transportation.
B. Prior to the commencement of construction activities, the
contractor shall submit a traffic control and business access
signage plan to the Department for review and approval. The plan
shall include the proposed location, size, legend, and mounting
details of all business access signage. The Department may require
modifications to the plan to ensure visibility, safety, and
compliance with Department standards and the Manual on Uniform
Traffic Control Devices.
C. The contractor shall maintain business access signage in
good condition, ensuring visibility and accuracy throughout the
duration of the project. Upon substantial completion of the project
or cessation of construction activities affecting access, the
contractor shall remove all business access signage in a timely
manner.
D. The Department may withhold progress payments or assess
penalties to the contractor for failure to comply with the
requirements of this section. Penalties shall amount to Ten
Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day the contractor is out of
compliance with this section.
Req. No. 15450 Page 2

F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any
business access signage that interferes with official traffic
control devices or violates any existing law relating to traffic
control or highway safety.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15450 JBH 12/18/25

















Req. No. 15450 Page 3